Hawaii statutes.
§415A-17 Termination of professional
activities. If a professional corporation shall cease to render
professional services, it shall amend its articles of incorporation to delete
from its stated purposes the rendering of professional services and to conform
to the requirements of chapter 414. After the amended articles of
incorporation have been delivered to the director for filing, the corporation
then may continue in existence as a corporation under chapter 414, and shall no
longer be subject to this chapter. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 135,
§121; am L 2002, c 40, §50]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next